Alabama, session 2026rs, HB66.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Driver Communication and Safety Enhancement Act.
Section 2. Section 32-6-6, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§32-6-6
(a) Each driver license issued by the Alabama State Law
Enforcement Agency (ALEA), except temporary permits or other
special circumstances as determined by the Secretary of the
Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency, shall contain a
distinguishing number assigned to the licensee and a color
photograph of the licensee, the name, birthdate, address, and
a description of the licensee., who, for For the purpose of
identification and as a condition precedent to the validity of
the license, immediately upon receipt of the license, the
licensee shall endorse his or her usual or regular signature
upon the license in the space provided, unless a facsimile of
the licensee's signature appears on the license.
(b) A photo driver license and photo nondriver
identification card as provided in Section 32-6-4 shall have a
Page 1

identification card as provided in Section 32-6-4 shall have a
HB66 Enrolled
photo core that meets the minimum width and length dimensions
specified in ANSI standards X4.13-1971 and ANSI standard CR80,
plus or minus 1/4 inch. In addition to all current and
existing fees, the agencyALEA may charge an additional fee to
recover the cost of producing and issuing photo driver
licenses and photo nondriver identification cards. The fee may
not exceed ten cents ($.10) ($0.10) over the actual cost of
producing and issuing the license or card, including the cost
of materials, labor costs, telecommunications costs, computer
costs, postage, and any other costs incurred in producing and
issuing a license or card.
(c)(1) ALEA shall provide a method for an individual to
voluntarily designate on his or her driver license or
nondriver identification card that the individual has been
diagnosed with an invisible medical condition. ALEA shall
create a discrete designation or mark to place on the license
or card of the individual requesting the designation. ALEA may
not charge a fee solely for the designation.
(2) To receive the designation, the individual shall
provide proof of the diagnosis from a physician licensed to
practice medicine in this state.
(c)(d) A driver license issued to a qualifying student
described in Section 16-28-40(b) shall be exempt from any fees
under this section.
(d)(e) Revenues collected under this section shall be
used by the agencyALEA for the sole purpose of this program,
and any excess shall revert to the State General Fund at the
end of each fiscal year.
Page 2

end of each fiscal year.
HB66 Enrolled
(f) For the purposes of this section, the term
"invisible medical condition" means a physical or mental
condition that may interfere with an individual's ability to
communicate with a first responder, including:
(1) A communication impediment;
(2) Autism spectrum disorder;
(3) Traumatic brain injury;
(4) Epilepsy;
(5) Schizophrenia; or
(6) A cognitive disability.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
HB66 Enrolled






________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 27-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 10-Feb-26 Passed



Page 4